Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.0289

"Whoever," "person."

"Whoever" and "person," as used in this chapter, include natural persons, corporations and partnerships and associations of persons; and when any corporate officer, director or stockholder or any partner authorizes, participates in, or knowingly accepts benefits from any violation of this chapter committed by his or her corporation or partnership, he or she shall be punishable for such violation as if it had been directly committed by him or her.

[ 1987 c 4 s 23. Formerly RCW 9.46.020(22).]